Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 329.451 is amended to read:
329.451. (1)(a) At or before grade 12, a school district  or public charter school shall award a
high school diploma to a student who completes the requirements established by subsection (2) of
this section.
(b) A school district or public charter school shall award a modified diploma to  a student who
satisfies the requirements established by subsection (7) of this section, an  extended diploma to a
student who satisfies the requirements established by subsection (8) of this section or a certificate
of attendance to a student who satisfies the requirements established by subsection (9) of this sec-
tion.
(c) A school district or public charter school may not deny a student  who has the documented
history described in subsection (7)(b) or (8)(b) of this section the opportunity to  pursue a diploma
with more stringent requirements than a modified diploma or an extended diploma.
(d) A school district or public  charter school may award a modified diploma or extended diploma
to a student only upon receiving consent as provided by subsection (6) of this section.
(2)(a) In order to receive a  high school diploma from a school district or public charter school,
a student must satisfy the requirements established by the State  Board of Education and the school
district or public charter school and, while in grades 9 through 12, must complete at least:
(A) Twenty-four total credits;
(B) Three credits of mathematics; and
(C) Four credits of language arts.
(b) If a school  district or public charter school requires a student to complete more than 24 total
credits, as provided by paragraph (a)(A) of this subsection, the  school district or public charter
school may only require the student to complete additional credits for:
(A) Subjects for which the State Board of Education has  established academic content standards
under ORS 329.045;
(B) Courses provided as part of a career and technical education program; or
(C) Courses that provide, or qualify to provide, credit at post-secondary institutions of education.
Enrolled House Bill 4137 (HB 4137-INTRO) Page 1
(c)(A) A school district  or public charter school that requires students to satisfy any require-
ments not  specified by paragraph (a) of this subsection or by rule of the State Board of Education
must grant to a student  a waiver of the requirements established by the school district or public
charter school if the student is or, at any time from grade 9 to 12, was:
(i) A foster child, as defined in ORS 30.297;
(ii) Homeless, as determined under  rules adopted by the State Board of Education based on
standards adopted by the Department of Human Services;
(iii) A runaway, as determined under  rules adopted by the State Board of Education based on
standards adopted by the Department of Human Services;
(iv) A child in a military family covered by the Interstate Compact on Educational  Opportunity
for Military Children, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board of Education;
(v) A child of a  migrant worker, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board of Edu-
cation;
(vi) Enrolled in the Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile Detention  Education
Program; or
(vii) Enrolled in an approved recovery school under ORS 336.680.
(B)(i) For  any student identified under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, a school district or
public charter school must  accept any credits earned by the student in an educational program in
this state and apply those credits toward requirements specified by paragraph (a)  of this subsection
or by rule of the State Board  of Education if the credits satisfied those requirements in that edu-
cational program in this state.
(ii) As  used in this subparagraph, “educational program in this state” means an educational
program that is:
(I) Provided  by a school district, a public charter school, an approved recovery school, the
Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile Detention Education Program; or
(II) Funded as provided by ORS 343.243 for students in a long term care  or treatment facility
described in ORS 343.961 or a hospital identified in ORS 343.261.
(d)(A) The State Board of Education  shall adopt rules by which a student who has com-
pleted an International Baccalaureate  program may satisfy the credit requirements pre-
scribed by  paragraph (a) of this subsection and any or all of the requirements established
by rule of the State Board of Education under paragraph (a) of this subsection. The rules:
(i) Must provide that the student has  satisfied those requirements if the student has
satisfied:
(I) All of the requirements for an International Baccalaureate  Diploma Programme or
an International Baccalaureate Career-related Programme; and
(II) Any other requirements prescribed by  the board by rule for a student who has
completed an International Baccalaureate program.
(ii) May provide that, only for the purpose of  satisfying requirements as provided by this
paragraph, a person who is not an external International Baccalaureate examiner may grade
assessments or examinations for either program.
(B) Nothing in this paragraph  prohibits a school district or public charter school from
establishing requirements that are  in addition to the credit requirements prescribed by par-
agraph (a) of  this subsection or any requirements established by rule under paragraph (a)
of this subsection or subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(C) When establishing  requirements under this paragraph, the board or a school district
or public charter  school shall attempt not to establish requirements that may discourage
access to or participation in the International Baccalaureate program.
(3) A student providing work samples to demonstrate proficiency in  Essential Learning Skills
as may be required under subsection (2) of this section must be allowed to use  accommodations de-
scribed in the student’s individualized education program or the  student’s plan developed in ac-
cordance with section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C.  794. As used in this
subsection, the term “accommodations”:
Enrolled House Bill 4137 (HB 4137-INTRO) Page 2
(a) Includes, but is not limited to:
(A) Additional time to demonstrate proficiency.
(B) The ability to demonstrate proficiency in an  alternative location that is secure and
proctored.
(C) The use of text-to-speech or speech-to-text technology or other assistive technology.
(b) Does not include  modifications that lower the proficiency standards or that are used solely
to earn modified credit.
(4) A student  may satisfy the requirements of subsection (2) of this section in less than four
years. If a student satisfies the requirements of subsection (2) of this  section and a school district
or public charter school has received consent as provided  by subsection (6) of this section, the
school district or public charter school shall award a high school diploma to the student.
(5) If a school district or  public charter school has received consent as provided by subsection
(6) of  this section, the school district or public charter school may advance the student to the next
grade level if the student has satisfied the requirements for the student’s current grade level.
(6)(a) For the  purpose of receiving consent as provided by subsections (1)(d), (4) and (5) of this
section, consent shall be provided by:
(A) The parent or guardian of the student, if the student:
(i) Is under 18 years of age and is not emancipated pursuant to ORS 419B.550 to 419B.558; or
(ii) Has been determined not to  have the ability to give informed consent regarding the student’s
education pursuant to a protective proceeding under ORS chapter 125; or
(B) The student, if the student is 18 years of  age or older or is emancipated pursuant to ORS
419B.550 to 419B.558.
(b) For  the purpose of awarding a modified diploma or extended diploma as provided by sub-
section (1)(d) of this section or of awarding a high school diploma as provided by subsection (4)  of
this section, consent must be  received during the school year for which the diploma will be awarded.
(7) A school district  or public charter school shall award a modified diploma only to students
who have  demonstrated the inability to meet the full set of academic content standards for a high
school diploma with reasonable modifications and accommodations. To be eligible for a  modified di-
ploma, a student must:
(a) Satisfy the  requirements for a modified diploma established by the State Board of Education;
and
(b) Have a documented history of an inability  to maintain grade level achievement due to sig-
nificant learning  and instructional barriers or have a documented history of a medical condition that
creates a barrier to achievement.
(8) A school district or public charter school shall award an extended diploma only  to students
who have  demonstrated the inability to meet the full set of academic content standards for a high
school diploma with reasonable modifications and accommodations. To be eligible for an  extended
diploma, a student must:
(a) While in grade nine through completion of high school, complete  12 credits, which may not
include more than six credits earned in a self-contained special education classroom  and shall in-
clude:
(A) Two credits of mathematics;
(B) Two credits of language arts;
(C) Two credits of science;
(D) Three credits of history, geography, economics or civics;
(E) One credit of health;
(F) One credit of physical education; and
(G) One credit of the arts or a world language; and
(b) Have a documented history of:
(A) An inability to  maintain grade level achievement due to significant learning and instruc-
tional barriers;
(B) A medical condition that creates a barrier to achievement; or
Enrolled House Bill 4137 (HB 4137-INTRO) Page 3
(C) A change in the student’s ability to participate in grade  level activities as a result of a se-
rious illness or injury that occurred after grade eight.
(9) A school district or public  charter school shall award a certificate of attendance to a student
who does not satisfy the requirements for  a high school diploma, a modified diploma or an extended
diploma if  the student has maintained regular full-time attendance for at least four years beginning
in grade nine and meets requirements established by the board of the school district or  public
charter school.
(10) A student shall have the opportunity to  satisfy the requirements of subsection (7), (8) or (9)
of this section by the later of:
(a) Four years after starting grade nine; or
(b) The student reaching the  age of 21 years, if the student is entitled to a public education until
the age of 21 years under state or federal law.
(11)(a) A student may  satisfy the requirements described in subsection (7), (8) or (9) of this sec-
tion in less than four years if consent  is provided in the manner described in subsection (6)(a) of this
section.
(b) The consent provided under this subsection must be written and must clearly state  that the
parent, guardian or student is waiving the time allowed under subsection (10)  of this section. A
consent may not be used  to allow a student to satisfy the requirements of subsection (7), (8) or (9)
of this section in less than three years.
(c) A copy of all consents provided under this  subsection for students in a school district must
be forwarded to the district superintendent.
(d) Each school district must provide to the Superintendent of Public Instruction  information
about the number of consents provided during a school year.
(12)(a) A  student who qualifies to receive or receives a modified diploma, an extended diploma
or a certificate of attendance shall:
(A) Have the option of participating in a  high school graduation ceremony with the class of the
student; and
(B) Have access to instructional hours, hours of transition services and hours of  other services
that are designed to:
(i) Meet the unique needs of the student; and
(ii) When added together, provide  a total number of hours of instruction and services to the
student that equals at least the total number of instructional  hours that is required to be provided
to students who are attending a public high school.
(b) A school district may not unilaterally decrease the total number of hours  of instruction and
services to which the student has access under paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, regardless of  the
age of the student.
(c) For purposes of paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, transition services  and other services
designed to meet the unique needs of the student may be provided to  the student through an inter-
agency agreement entered  into by the school district if the individualized education program devel-
oped for the student indicates that the services  may be provided by another agency. A school
district that enters into  an interagency agreement as allowed under this paragraph retains the re-
sponsibility for ensuring that the student has access to the  number of service hours required to be
provided to the student under this subsection. An  agency is not required to change any eligibility
criteria or enrollment standards prior to entering into an interagency  agreement as provided by this
paragraph.
(13) A school district or public charter school shall:
(a) Ensure that all  students have on-site access to the appropriate resources and courses to
achieve  high  school diplomas, modified diplomas and extended diplomas at each high school in the
school district or at the public charter school.
(b) Provide literacy instruction to all students until graduation.
(c)(A) Provide to the  parents or guardians of a student who has the documented history de-
scribed in subsection (8)(b) of this section:
Enrolled House Bill 4137 (HB 4137-INTRO) Page 4
(i) Information  about the availability of high school diplomas, modified diplomas and extended
diplomas and the requirements for the diplomas; and
(ii) A disclosure that a student awarded  a certificate of attendance will not be counted as a high
school graduate in any reporting for the state or school  district and that a student awarded a cer-
tificate of attendance may not indicate that the student  received a high school diploma on applica-
tions for employment, military  service, financial aid, admittance to an institution of higher education
or any other purpose.
(B) The information and disclosure required under subparagraph (A) of this  paragraph must be
provided annually:
(i) Beginning in grade five; or
(ii) Beginning after a documented history described in subsection (8)(b) of this section has  been
established.
(14) A school district or public charter school shall allow  a student to participate in the high
school graduation ceremony with the class of the student and to wear:
(a) Native American items of cultural significance as provided by ORS 332.112; or
(b) A dress uniform issued to the student  by a branch of the Armed Forces of the United States
if the student:
(A) Qualifies to receive a high school  diploma, a modified diploma, an extended diploma or a
certificate of attendance under this section; and
(B) Has completed  basic training for, and is an active member of, a branch of the Armed Forces
of the United States.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 329.451, as amended  by section 1, chapter 175, Oregon Laws 2021, section 6,
chapter 81, Oregon Laws 2022, section 3, chapter  202, Oregon Laws 2023, and section 9, chapter 513,
Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
329.451. (1)(a) At or before grade 12, a  school district or public charter school shall award a
high school diploma to a student who completes the requirements established by subsection (2) of
this section.
(b) A school district  or public charter school shall award a modified diploma to a student who
satisfies the requirements established by  subsection (7) of this section, an extended diploma to a
student who satisfies the requirements established by subsection (8) of this section or a certificate
of attendance to a student who satisfies the requirements established by subsection (9) of this sec-
tion.
(c) A school district or  public charter school may not deny a student who has the documented
history described in subsection  (7)(b) or (8)(b) of this section the opportunity to pursue a diploma
with more stringent requirements than a modified diploma or an extended diploma.
(d) A school district or public  charter school may award a modified diploma or extended diploma
to a student only upon receiving consent as provided by subsection (6) of this section.
(2)(a) In order to receive a high school diploma from a school  district or public charter school,
a student must satisfy the requirements established by the State  Board of Education and the school
district or public charter school and, while in grades  9 through 12, must complete at least 24 total
credits, which must include at least:
(A) Three credits of mathematics;
(B) Four credits of language arts; and
(C) One half-credit of civics.
(b) If a school  district or public charter school requires a student to complete more than 24 total
credits, as provided by paragraph (a) of this subsection, the school district or public charter school
may only require the student to complete additional credits for:
(A) Subjects for which the State Board of Education has  established academic content standards
under ORS 329.045;
(B) Courses provided as part of a career and technical education program; or
(C) Courses that provide, or qualify to provide, credit at post-secondary institutions of education.
Enrolled House Bill 4137 (HB 4137-INTRO) Page 5
(c)(A) A school district or public charter school that requires students to  satisfy any require-
ments not specified by paragraph (a) of this subsection or by rule of the State Board of  Education
must grant to a student a waiver of the requirements established by the  school district or public
charter school if the student is or, at any time from grade 9 to 12, was:
(i) A foster child, as defined in ORS 30.297;
(ii) Homeless, as determined under  rules adopted by the State Board of Education based on
standards adopted by the Department of Human Services;
(iii) A runaway, as determined under  rules adopted by the State Board of Education based on
standards adopted by the Department of Human Services;
(iv) A child in a military family covered by the Interstate Compact on Educational  Opportunity
for Military Children, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board of Education;
(v) A child of a  migrant worker, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board of Edu-
cation;
(vi) Enrolled in the Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile Detention  Education
Program; or
(vii) Enrolled in an approved recovery school under ORS 336.680.
(B)(i) For  any student identified under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, a school district or
public charter school must  accept any credits earned by the student in an educational program in
this state and apply those credits toward requirements specified by paragraph (a)  of this subsection
or by rule of the State Board  of Education if the credits satisfied those requirements in that edu-
cational program in this state.
(ii) As  used in this subparagraph, “educational program in this state” means an educational
program that is:
(I) Provided  by a school district, a public charter school, an approved recovery school, the
Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile Detention Education Program; or
(II) Funded as provided by ORS 343.243 for students in a long term care  or treatment facility
described in ORS 343.961 or a hospital identified in ORS 343.261.
(d)(A) The State Board of Education  shall adopt rules by which a student who has com-
pleted an International Baccalaureate  program may satisfy the credit requirements pre-
scribed by  paragraph (a) of this subsection and any or all of the requirements established
by rule of the State Board of Education under paragraph (a) of this subsection. The rules:
(i) Must provide that the student has  satisfied those requirements if the student has
satisfied:
(I) All of the requirements for an International Baccalaureate  Diploma Programme or
an International Baccalaureate Career-related Programme; and
(II) Any other requirements prescribed by  the board by rule for a student who has
completed an International Baccalaureate program.
(ii) May provide that, only for the purpose of  satisfying requirements as provided by this
paragraph, a person who is not an external International Baccalaureate examiner may grade
assessments or examinations for either program.
(B) Nothing in this paragraph  prohibits a school district or public charter school from
establishing requirements that are  in addition to the credit requirements prescribed by par-
agraph (a) of  this subsection or any requirements established by rule under paragraph (a)
of this subsection or subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(C) When establishing  requirements under this paragraph, the board or a school district
or public charter  school shall attempt not to establish requirements that may discourage
access to or participation in the International Baccalaureate program.
(3) A student providing work samples to demonstrate proficiency in  Essential Learning Skills
as may be required under subsection (2) of this section must be allowed to use  accommodations de-
scribed in the student’s individualized education program or the  student’s plan developed in ac-
cordance with section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C.  794. As used in this
subsection, the term “accommodations”:
Enrolled House Bill 4137 (HB 4137-INTRO) Page 6
(a) Includes, but is not limited to:
(A) Additional time to demonstrate proficiency.
(B) The ability to demonstrate proficiency in an  alternative location that is secure and
proctored.
(C) The use of text-to-speech or speech-to-text technology or other assistive technology.
(b) Does not include  modifications that lower the proficiency standards or that are used solely
to earn modified credit.
(4) A student  may satisfy the requirements of subsection (2) of this section in less than four
years. If a student satisfies the requirements of subsection (2) of this  section and a school district
or public charter school has received consent as provided  by subsection (6) of this section, the
school district or public charter school shall award a high school diploma to the student.
(5) If a school district or  public charter school has received consent as provided by subsection
(6) of  this section, the school district or public charter school may advance the student to the next
grade level if the student has satisfied the requirements for the student’s current grade level.
(6)(a) For the  purpose of receiving consent as provided by subsections (1)(d), (4) and (5) of this
section, consent shall be provided by:
(A) The parent or guardian of the student, if the student:
(i) Is under 18 years of age and is not emancipated pursuant to ORS 419B.550 to 419B.558; or
(ii) Has been determined not to  have the ability to give informed consent regarding the student’s
education pursuant to a protective proceeding under ORS chapter 125; or
(B) The student, if the student is 18 years of  age or older or is emancipated pursuant to ORS
419B.550 to 419B.558.
(b) For  the purpose of awarding a modified diploma or extended diploma as provided by sub-
section (1)(d) of this section or of awarding a high school diploma as provided by subsection (4)  of
this section, consent must be  received during the school year for which the diploma will be awarded.
(7) A school district  or public charter school shall award a modified diploma only to students
who have  demonstrated the inability to meet the full set of academic content standards for a high
school diploma with reasonable modifications and accommodations. To be eligible for a  modified di-
ploma, a student must:
(a) Satisfy the  requirements for a modified diploma established by the State Board of Education;
and
(b) Have a documented history of an inability  to maintain grade level achievement due to sig-
nificant learning  and instructional barriers or have a documented history of a medical condition that
creates a barrier to achievement.
(8) A school district or public charter school shall award an extended diploma only  to students
who have  demonstrated the inability to meet the full set of academic content standards for a high
school diploma with reasonable modifications and accommodations. To be eligible for an  extended
diploma, a student must:
(a) While in grade nine through completion of high school, complete  12 credits, which may not
include more than six credits earned in a self-contained special education classroom  and shall in-
clude:
(A) Two credits of mathematics;
(B) Two credits of language arts;
(C) Two credits of science;
(D) Three credits of history, geography, economics or civics;
(E) One credit of health;
(F) One credit of physical education; and
(G) One credit of the arts or a world language; and
(b) Have a documented history of:
(A) An inability to  maintain grade level achievement due to significant learning and instruc-
tional barriers;
(B) A medical condition that creates a barrier to achievement; or
Enrolled House Bill 4137 (HB 4137-INTRO) Page 7
(C) A change in the student’s ability to participate in grade  level activities as a result of a se-
rious illness or injury that occurred after grade eight.
(9) A school district or public  charter school shall award a certificate of attendance to a student
who does not satisfy the requirements for  a high school diploma, a modified diploma or an extended
diploma if  the student has maintained regular full-time attendance for at least four years beginning
in grade nine and meets requirements established by the board of the school district or  public
charter school.
(10) A student shall have the opportunity to  satisfy the requirements of subsection (7), (8) or (9)
of this section by the later of:
(a) Four years after starting grade nine; or
(b) The student reaching the  age of 21 years, if the student is entitled to a public education until
the age of 21 years under state or federal law.
(11)(a) A student may  satisfy the requirements described in subsection (7), (8) or (9) of this sec-
tion in less than four years if consent  is provided in the manner described in subsection (6)(a) of this
section.
(b) The consent provided under this subsection must be written and must clearly state  that the
parent, guardian or student is waiving the time allowed under subsection (10)  of this section. A
consent may not be used  to allow a student to satisfy the requirements of subsection (7), (8) or (9)
of this section in less than three years.
(c) A copy of all consents provided under this  subsection for students in a school district must
be forwarded to the district superintendent.
(d) Each school district must provide to the Superintendent of Public Instruction  information
about the number of consents provided during a school year.
(12)(a) A  student who qualifies to receive or receives a modified diploma, an extended diploma
or a certificate of attendance shall:
(A) Have the option of participating in a  high school graduation ceremony with the class of the
student; and
(B) Have access to instructional hours, hours of transition services and hours of  other services
that are designed to:
(i) Meet the unique needs of the student; and
(ii) When added together, provide  a total number of hours of instruction and services to the
student that equals at least the total number of instructional  hours that is required to be provided
to students who are attending a public high school.
(b) A school district may not unilaterally decrease the total number of hours  of instruction and
services to which the student has access under paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, regardless of  the
age of the student.
(c) For purposes of paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, transition services  and other services
designed to meet the unique needs of the student may be provided to  the student through an inter-
agency agreement entered  into by the school district if the individualized education program devel-
oped for the student indicates that the services  may be provided by another agency. A school
district that enters into  an interagency agreement as allowed under this paragraph retains the re-
sponsibility for ensuring that the student has access to the  number of service hours required to be
provided to the student under this subsection. An  agency is not required to change any eligibility
criteria or enrollment standards prior to entering into an interagency  agreement as provided by this
paragraph.
(13) A school district or public charter school shall:
(a) Ensure that all  students have on-site access to the appropriate resources and courses to
achieve  high  school diplomas, modified diplomas and extended diplomas at each high school in the
school district or at the public charter school.
(b) Provide literacy instruction to all students until graduation.
(c)(A) Provide to the  parents or guardians of a student who has the documented history de-
scribed in subsection (8)(b) of this section:
Enrolled House Bill 4137 (HB 4137-INTRO) Page 8
(i) Information  about the availability of high school diplomas, modified diplomas and extended
diplomas and the requirements for the diplomas; and
(ii) A disclosure that a student awarded  a certificate of attendance will not be counted as a high
school graduate in any reporting for the state or school  district and that a student awarded a cer-
tificate of attendance may not indicate that the student  received a high school diploma on applica-
tions for employment, military  service, financial aid, admittance to an institution of higher education
or any other purpose.
(B) The information and disclosure required under subparagraph (A) of this  paragraph must be
provided annually:
(i) Beginning in grade five; or
(ii) Beginning after a documented history described in subsection (8)(b) of this section has  been
established.
(14) A school district or public charter school shall allow  a student to participate in the high
school graduation ceremony with the class of the student and to wear:
(a) Native American items of cultural significance as provided by ORS 332.112; or
(b) A dress uniform issued to the student  by a branch of the Armed Forces of the United States
if the student:
(A) Qualifies to receive a high school  diploma, a modified diploma, an extended diploma or a
certificate of attendance under this section; and
(B) Has completed  basic training for, and is an active member of, a branch of the Armed Forces
of the United States.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 329.451, as amended  by section 1, chapter 175, Oregon Laws 2021, section 6,
chapter 81, Oregon Laws 2022, section  3, chapter 202, Oregon Laws 2023, section 9, chapter 513,
Oregon Laws 2023, and section 1, chapter 564, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
329.451. (1)(a) At or before grade 12, a school district  or public charter school shall award a
high school diploma to a student who completes the requirements established by subsection (2) of
this section.
(b) A school district or public charter school shall award a modified diploma to  a student who
satisfies the requirements established by subsection (7) of this section, an  extended diploma to a
student who satisfies the requirements established by subsection (8) of this section or a certificate
of attendance to a student who satisfies the requirements established by subsection (9) of this sec-
tion.
(c) A school district or public charter school may not deny a student  who has the documented
history described in subsection (7)(b) or (8)(b) of this section the opportunity to  pursue a diploma
with more stringent requirements than a modified diploma or an extended diploma.
(d) A school district or public  charter school may award a modified diploma or extended diploma
to a student only upon receiving consent as provided by subsection (6) of this section.
(2)(a) In order to receive a  high school diploma from a school district or public charter school,
a student must satisfy the requirements established by the State  Board of Education and the school
district or public charter school and, while in grades 9  through 12, must complete at least 24 total
credits, which must include at least:
(A) Three credits of mathematics;
(B) Four credits of language arts;
(C) One half-credit of civics;
(D) One half-credit of higher education and career path skills; and
(E) One half-credit of personal financial education.
(b) If a school  district or public charter school requires a student to complete more than 24 total
credits, as provided by paragraph (a) of this subsection, the school district or public charter school
may only require the student to complete additional credits for:
(A) Subjects for which the State Board of Education has  established academic content standards
under ORS 329.045;
(B) Courses provided as part of a career and technical education program; or
Enrolled House Bill 4137 (HB 4137-INTRO) Page 9
(C) Courses that provide, or qualify to provide, credit at post-secondary institutions of education.
(c)(A) A school district  or public charter school that requires students to satisfy any require-
ments not  specified by paragraph (a) of this subsection or by rule of the State Board of Education
must grant to a student  a waiver of the requirements established by the school district or public
charter school if the student is or, at any time from grade 9 to 12, was:
(i) A foster child, as defined in ORS 30.297;
(ii) Homeless, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board  of Education based on
standards adopted by the Department of Human Services;
(iii) A runaway, as determined under rules adopted by the State  Board of Education based on
standards adopted by the Department of Human Services;
(iv) A child in a military family covered by the Interstate Compact on Educational  Opportunity
for Military Children, as determined under rules adopted by the State Board of Education;
(v) A child of a migrant worker, as determined under rules adopted by the  State Board of Edu-
cation;
(vi) Enrolled in the Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile Detention  Education
Program; or
(vii) Enrolled in an approved recovery school under ORS 336.680.
(B)(i) For any student identified under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, a school district  or
public charter school must accept any credits earned by the student in an  educational program in
this state and apply those credits toward requirements specified by paragraph (a)  of this subsection
or by rule of the State Board of Education if the credits  satisfied those requirements in that edu-
cational program in this state.
(ii) As used in this subparagraph, “educational program in this state” means an  educational
program that is:
(I) Provided by a school district, a public charter school, an approved recovery school,  the
Youth Corrections Education Program or the Juvenile Detention Education Program; or
(II) Funded as provided  by ORS 343.243 for students in a long term care or treatment facility
described in ORS 343.961 or a hospital identified in ORS 343.261.
(d) The  State Board of Education may adopt by rule requirements for courses, including teachers
of courses, related  to higher education and career path skills and personal financial education that
allow the courses to satisfy multiple credit requirements for a high school diploma, including math-
ematics.
(e)(A) The State Board of  Education shall adopt rules by which a student who has com-
pleted an International Baccalaureate  program may satisfy the credit requirements pre-
scribed by  paragraph (a) of this subsection and any or all of the requirements established
by rule of the State Board of Education under paragraph (a) of this subsection. The rules:
(i) Must provide that the student has  satisfied those requirements if the student has
satisfied:
(I) All of the requirements for an International Baccalaureate  Diploma Programme or
an International Baccalaureate Career-related Programme; and
(II) Any other requirements prescribed by  the board by rule for a student who has
completed an International Baccalaureate program.
(ii) May provide that, only for the purpose of  satisfying requirements as provided by this
paragraph, a person who is not an external International Baccalaureate examiner may grade
assessments or examinations for either program.
(B) Nothing in this paragraph  prohibits a school district or public charter school from
establishing requirements that are  in addition to the credit requirements prescribed by par-
agraph (a) of  this subsection or any requirements established by rule under paragraph (a)
of this subsection or subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(C) When establishing  requirements under this paragraph, the board or a school district
or public charter  school shall attempt not to establish requirements that may discourage
access to or participation in the International Baccalaureate program.
Enrolled House Bill 4137 (HB 4137-INTRO) Page 10
(3) A student providing work samples to demonstrate proficiency in  Essential Learning Skills
as may be required under subsection (2) of this section must be allowed to use  accommodations de-
scribed in the student’s individualized education program or the  student’s plan developed in ac-
cordance with section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C.  794. As used in this
subsection, the term “accommodations”:
(a) Includes, but is not limited to:
(A) Additional time to demonstrate proficiency.
(B) The ability to demonstrate proficiency in an  alternative location that is secure and
proctored.
(C) The use of text-to-speech or speech-to-text technology or other assistive technology.
(b) Does not include  modifications that lower the proficiency standards or that are used solely
to earn modified credit.
(4) A student  may satisfy the requirements of subsection (2) of this section in less than four
years. If a student satisfies the requirements of subsection (2) of this  section and a school district
or public charter school has received consent as provided  by subsection (6) of this section, the
school district or public charter school shall award a high school diploma to the student.
(5) If a school district or  public charter school has received consent as provided by subsection
(6) of  this section, the school district or public charter school may advance the student to the next
grade level if the student has satisfied the requirements for the student’s current grade level.
(6)(a) For the  purpose of receiving consent as provided by subsections (1)(d), (4) and (5) of this
section, consent shall be provided by:
(A) The parent or guardian of the student, if the student:
(i) Is under 18 years of age and is not emancipated pursuant to ORS 419B.550 to 419B.558; or
(ii) Has been determined not to  have the ability to give informed consent regarding the student’s
education pursuant to a protective proceeding under ORS chapter 125; or
(B) The student, if the student is 18 years of  age or older or is emancipated pursuant to ORS
419B.550 to 419B.558.
(b) For  the purpose of awarding a modified diploma or extended diploma as provided by sub-
section (1)(d) of this section or of awarding a high school diploma as provided by subsection (4)  of
this section, consent must be  received during the school year for which the diploma will be awarded.
(7) A school district  or public charter school shall award a modified diploma only to students
who have  demonstrated the inability to meet the full set of academic content standards for a high
school diploma with reasonable modifications and accommodations. To be eligible for a  modified di-
ploma, a student must:
(a) Satisfy the  requirements for a modified diploma established by the State Board of Education;
and
(b) Have a documented history of an inability  to maintain grade level achievement due to sig-
nificant learning  and instructional barriers or have a documented history of a medical condition that
creates a barrier to achievement.
(8) A school district or public charter school shall award an extended diploma only  to students
who have  demonstrated the inability to meet the full set of academic content standards for a high
school diploma with reasonable modifications and accommodations. To be eligible for an  extended
diploma, a student must:
(a) While in grade nine through completion of high school, complete  12 credits, which may not
include more than six credits earned in a self-contained special education classroom  and shall in-
clude:
(A) Two credits of mathematics;
(B) Two credits of language arts;
(C) Two credits of science;
(D) Three credits of history, geography, economics or civics;
(E) One credit of health;
(F) One credit of physical education; and
Enrolled House Bill 4137 (HB 4137-INTRO) Page 11
(G) One credit of the arts or a world language; and
(b) Have a documented history of:
(A) An inability to  maintain grade level achievement due to significant learning and instruc-
tional barriers;
(B) A medical condition that creates a barrier to achievement; or
(C) A change in the student’s ability to participate in grade  level activities as a result of a se-
rious illness or injury that occurred after grade eight.
(9) A school district or public  charter school shall award a certificate of attendance to a student
who does not satisfy the requirements for  a high school diploma, a modified diploma or an extended
diploma if  the student has maintained regular full-time attendance for at least four years beginning
in grade nine and meets requirements established by the board of the school district or  public
charter school.
(10) A student shall have the opportunity to  satisfy the requirements of subsection (7), (8) or (9)
of this section by the later of:
(a) Four years after starting grade nine; or
(b) The student reaching the  age of 21 years, if the student is entitled to a public education until
the age of 21 years under state or federal law.
(11)(a) A student may  satisfy the requirements described in subsection (7), (8) or (9) of this sec-
tion in less than four years if consent  is provided in the manner described in subsection (6)(a) of this
section.
(b) The consent provided under this subsection must be written and must clearly state  that the
parent, guardian or student is waiving the time allowed under subsection (10)  of this section. A
consent may not be used  to allow a student to satisfy the requirements of subsection (7), (8) or (9)
of this section in less than three years.
(c) A copy of all consents provided under this  subsection for students in a school district must
be forwarded to the district superintendent.
(d) Each school district must provide to the Superintendent of Public Instruction  information
about the number of consents provided during a school year.
(12)(a) A  student who qualifies to receive or receives a modified diploma, an extended diploma
or a certificate of attendance shall:
(A) Have the option of participating in a  high school graduation ceremony with the class of the
student; and
(B) Have access to instructional hours, hours of transition services and hours of  other services
that are designed to:
(i) Meet the unique needs of the student; and
(ii) When added together, provide  a total number of hours of instruction and services to the
student that equals at least the total number of instructional  hours that is required to be provided
to students who are attending a public high school.
(b) A school district may not unilaterally decrease the total number of hours  of instruction and
services to which the student has access under paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, regardless of  the
age of the student.
(c) For purposes of paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, transition services  and other services
designed to meet the unique needs of the student may be provided to  the student through an inter-
agency agreement entered  into by the school district if the individualized education program devel-
oped for the student indicates that the services  may be provided by another agency. A school
district that enters into  an interagency agreement as allowed under this paragraph retains the re-
sponsibility for ensuring that the student has access to the  number of service hours required to be
provided to the student under this subsection. An  agency is not required to change any eligibility
criteria or enrollment standards prior to entering into an interagency  agreement as provided by this
paragraph.
(13) A school district or public charter school shall:
Enrolled House Bill 4137 (HB 4137-INTRO) Page 12
(a) Ensure that all  students have on-site access to the appropriate resources and courses to
achieve  high  school diplomas, modified diplomas and extended diplomas at each high school in the
school district or at the public charter school.
(b) Provide literacy instruction to all students until graduation.
(c)(A) Provide to the parents or guardians of a student who has the  documented history de-
scribed in subsection (8)(b) of this section:
(i) Information about the availability of high school diplomas, modified diplomas and  extended
diplomas and the requirements for the diplomas; and
(ii) A disclosure that a student awarded  a certificate of attendance will not be counted as a high
school graduate in any reporting for the state or school  district and that a student awarded a cer-
tificate of attendance may not indicate that the student  received a high school diploma on applica-
tions for employment, military  service, financial aid, admittance to an institution of higher education
or any other purpose.
(B) The information and disclosure required under subparagraph (A) of this  paragraph must be
provided annually:
(i) Beginning in grade five; or
(ii) Beginning after a documented history described in subsection (8)(b) of this section has  been
established.
(14) A school district or public charter school shall allow  a student to participate in the high
school graduation ceremony with the class of the student and to wear:
(a) Native American items of cultural significance as provided by ORS 332.112; or
(b) A dress uniform issued to the student  by a branch of the Armed Forces of the United States
if the student:
(A) Qualifies to receive a high school  diploma, a modified diploma, an extended diploma or a
certificate of attendance under this section; and
(B) Has completed  basic training for, and is an active member of, a branch of the Armed Forces
of the United States.
Passed by House February 15, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate February 28, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4137 (HB 4137-INTRO) Page 13